Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-809
Violation; ouster.

No corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association which manufactures or produces any article for sale or transportation within this state and which does any of the acts or things prohibited to be done by sections 59-801 to 59-831 shall engage in business within this state.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 10, p. 640;

R.S.1913, § 4054;

C.S.1922, § 3457;

C.S.1929, § 59-810;

R.S.1943, § 59-809;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 364;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 3.